Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 1

General Provisions

20-2-101. Summons from general sessions court.

The summons from a court of general sessions shall be substantially the same as the summons from a court of record, but requiring the defendant to appear before the judge on a day fixed, or generally. If no time or place is designated, the officer serving the process shall notify the defendant of the time and place, and make the officer's return accordingly.

Code 1858, § 2817; Shan., § 4522; Code 1932, § 8649; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-204; modified.

Cross-References. Summons, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 3, 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-4-1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Amendments,. § 9; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 118.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Rejection of Transient Jurisdiction Over an Unincorporated Association, 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 291 (1986).

Comparative Legislation. Commencement of actions:

Ala. Code §6-4-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-58-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §9-11-3 et seq.

Ky. R. C. P. 3 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §13-3-1 et seq.

Mo. Sup. Ct. R. 53.01, 54.01-54.04, 54.13, 54.16, 54.17, 54.20, 54.22.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 1A-1.

Va. Code § 8.01-270 et seq.

20-2-102. Security for costs and damages.

The general sessions judge may, and the clerk shall, before issuing the summons or other leading process, require the plaintiff to enter into bond, with sufficient surety, conditioned to prosecute the plaintiff's suit with effect, or to pay such costs and damages as may be awarded against the plaintiff by the court having cognizance thereof, unless the plaintiff sue in forma pauperis.

Code 1858, § 2818 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 19, § 1); Shan., § 4523; Code 1932, § 8650; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-205.

Cross-References. Actions in forma pauperis, §§20-12-127 —20-12-133.

Appointment of counsel for paupers, §23-2-101.

Bond on change of venue, §20-4-207.

Requirement of bond, §§20-12-120 —20-12-126.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 81.

Law Reviews.

Pleadings, Motions and Pre-Trial Procedure, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Cited: In re Barrett, 132 F. 362, 1904 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 133 (D. Tenn. 1904); Kelley v. Byington, 185 Tenn. 421, 206 S.W.2d 409, 1947 Tenn. LEXIS 347 (1947).

20-2-103. Date of process shown — Penalty for violation.

The clerk, general sessions judge or attorney issuing any process shall mark on the process the day on which the process is issued; and the sheriff or other officer into whose hands the process comes to be executed, shall, in like manner, mark on the process the day on which the sheriff or other officer received it.

The penalty for neglect of this requirement shall be a forfeiture of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), to be recovered in any court having cognizance thereof, by any persons who shall sue for the penalty, with costs.

Code 1858, § 2819 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 9); Shan., § 4524; Code 1932, § 8651; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 26; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 12; 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 14.

Cited: Glenn v. Payne, 153 Tenn. 240, 280 S.W. 1019, 1925 Tenn. LEXIS 24 (1926).

20-2-104. Issuance of process on Sunday.

Civil process may be issued on Sundays on the application of any party, supported by oath or affirmation, that the defendant is removing or about to remove the defendant's person or property beyond the jurisdiction of the court applied to.

The clerk or general sessions judge shall endorse on the back of the process that it was obtained on the oath of the plaintiff, the plaintiff's agent or attorney, as directed in subsection (a).

It is the duty of the proper officers to execute all such process on Sundays, subject to the same penalties and regulations as in other cases.

Code 1858, §§ 2824-2826 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 1, §§ 1-3); Shan., §§ 4529-4531; Code 1932, §§ 8656-8658; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-207.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 126, 129.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Associations and Clubs, § 6; 23 Tenn. Juris., Sundays and Holidays, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Procedure — Motion to Dismiss in Chancery, 33 Tenn. L. Rev. 245.

Cited: Moss v. State, 131 Tenn. 94, 173 S.W. 859, 1914 Tenn. LEXIS 90, L.R.A. (n.s.) 1915D361 (1914); Jersey Farms Milk Service, Inc. v. Amalgamated Meat Cutters, etc., 297 F. Supp. 1098, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9545 (M.D. Tenn. 1969).

20-2-105. Service of process on Sunday on parties leaving jurisdiction.

Sheriffs or constables having process in their hands in civil actions pending in magistrate's court or courts of record, if it appears to their satisfaction that parties to be sued are leaving the county or state, have the right to execute the process on Sunday.

Acts 1885, ch. 53, § 1; Shan., § 4532; Code 1932, § 8659; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-208.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 126.

Law Reviews.

Procedure — Motion to Dismiss in Chancery, 33 Tenn. L. Rev. 245.

Cited: Moss v. State, 131 Tenn. 94, 173 S.W. 859, 1914 Tenn. LEXIS 90, L.R.A. (n.s.) 1915D361 (1914).

20-2-106. Process on Sunday generally prohibited.

With the exceptions contained in §§20-2-104 and20-2-105, civil process shall not be executed on Sunday.

Code 1858, § 2827 (deriv. Acts 1777 (Nov.), ch. 8, § 6); Acts 1885, ch. 53, § 1; Shan., § 4533; Code 1932, § 8660; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-209.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 126.

Cited: Moss v. State, 131 Tenn. 94, 173 S.W. 859, 1914 Tenn. LEXIS 90, L.R.A. (n.s.) 1915D361 (1914).

20-2-107. Process in other counties.

Process in local actions may run to any county.

Code 1858, § 2820; Shan., § 4525; Code 1932, § 8652; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-210.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 26.

Cited: Bell v. Hosse, 31 F.R.D. 181, 1962 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 5927 (M.D. Tenn. 1962).

20-2-108. Counterpart summons.

Where there are two (2) or more defendants in any suit in courts of law or equity or before judges of the courts of general sessions, the plaintiff may cause a counterpart summons or subpoena to be issued to any county where any of the defendants is most likely to be found, the fact that the counterpart process is issued in the same suit being noted on each process, which, when returned, shall be docketed as if only one (1) process had issued.

If the defendants are not served, the same proceedings shall be had as in cases of other similar process not executed.

The counterpart, when issued from a judge of the court of general sessions, shall be returned within thirty (30) days.

Code 1858, §§ 2821, 2822 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 25, § 3); Shan., §§ 4526, 4527; Code 1932, §§ 8653, 8654; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-211.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.01, summons and issuance thereof, except as to general sessions courts.

Cross-References. Summons and issuance thereof, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.01.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 127, 129.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 84; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 2; 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure and Evidence — Tennessee Survey 1970 (Jerry J. Phillips), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 127.

Cited: Southern Paving Const. Co. v. Knoxville, 245 F. 421, 1917 U.S. App. LEXIS 1503 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1917); Pinkerton v. Fox, 23 Tenn. App. 159, 129 S.W.2d 514, 1939 Tenn. App. LEXIS 22 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1939); Stevens v. Linton, 190 Tenn. 351, 229 S.W.2d 510, 1950 Tenn. LEXIS 492 (1950); Keeble v. Loudon Utilities, 212 Tenn. 483, 370 S.W.2d 531, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 442 (1963); Commercial Truck & Trailer Sales, Inc. v. McCampbell, 580 S.W.2d 765, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 427 (Tenn. 1979).

20-2-109. Service on joint obligor on negotiable paper.

In joint actions on negotiable paper, service of a counterpart writ on the drawer or maker shall not be sufficient service to hold the drawer or maker to answer the action, unless the original writ was executed on a joint drawer or maker.

Code 1858, § 2823 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 74, § 2); Shan., § 4528; Code 1932, § 8655; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-212.

Cross-References. Several liability on joint obligations, §§20-1-107,47-3-414.

Summons and issuance thereof, Tenn. R. Civil P. 4.01.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 121, 127.

20-2-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-2-110 (Code 1858, § 2828 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 19, § 13); Shan., § 4534; Code 1932, § 8661; Acts 1975, ch. 96, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-213), concerning tests of process, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 538, § 1.

20-2-111. Returns made with ink — Penalty for violation.

Sheriffs, constables and all officers are required to make their returns upon all processes issued to them with pen and ink or some other nonerasable material or fluid; but the failure of the officer to make the officer's return as required shall in no case vitiate the return.

Any officer violating this section commits a Class A misdemeanor, and is further liable in damages to any person or persons aggrieved by the violation.

Acts 1889, ch. 51, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 4537, 4538; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8664, 8665; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-216; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Powers of attorney to serve subpoenas, §23-2-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 23.13.

Collateral References.

Civil liability of one making false or fraudulent return of process. 31 A.L.R.3d 1393.

20-2-112. Wrongful death action by other than personal representative pending — Service in civil action against estate.

Where a wrongful death action has been instituted by any person other than an executor, executrix, administrator or administratrix of a decedent's estate, the estate may be made a party defendant to any civil action arising out of the same facts, happenings, or circumstances otherwise properly brought by serving process on the person instituting the original wrongful death action.

If, after a decedent's estate is made a party defendant as provided in subsection (a), an executor, executrix, administrator or administratrix of the decedent's estate is thereafter appointed, the person who instituted the original wrongful death action shall notify the executor, executrix, administrator or administratrix of the decedent's estate in writing of all actions heretofore instituted against the decedent's estate. The failure of the person to notify the executor, executrix, administrator or administratrix of the decedent's estate, as provided in this subsection (b), may render the person liable for all resultant damages.

Any individual served with process under this section shall notify any person or entity charged with the responsibility of defending the action to which the subject estate has been made a defendant. The notice shall be in writing.

Acts 1968, ch. 552, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 20-242.

Law Reviews.

Recent Developments in Tennessee and Federal Procedure (Donald F. Paine), 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 276.

Cited: Goss v. Hutchins, 751 S.W.2d 821, 1988 Tenn. LEXIS 67 (Tenn. 1988).

20-2-113. Long-arm statute — Service upon person in foreign country.

If service is to be effected upon a party in a foreign country, service of the summons and complaint may be made:

In the manner prescribed by the law of the foreign country for service in that country in an action in any of its courts of general jurisdiction;

As directed by the foreign authority in response to a letter rogatory, when service in either case is reasonably calculated to give actual notice;

Upon an individual, by delivery to the individual personally; and upon a corporation, partnership or association, by delivery to an officer or a managing or general agent;

By any form of mail requiring a signed receipt, to be addressed and dispatched by the clerk of the court to the party to be served; or

As directed by order of the court.

Service under subdivision (a)(3) or (a)(5) may be made by any person who is not a party and is not less than twenty-one (21) years of age, anyone duly authorized to serve summons by the law of the country where service is to be made or anyone designated by order of the court or the foreign court. On request, the clerk shall deliver the summons to the plaintiff for transmission to the person or the foreign court or officer who will make the service. Proof of service may be made as prescribed in Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4, by order of the court or by the law of the foreign country. Proof of service by mail shall include an affidavit or certificate of addressing and mailing by the clerk of court.

Acts 1992, ch. 679, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Service of Process Upon Foreign Defendants Under the Hague Convention (Michael L. Silhol) 28 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 16 (1992).